Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.030

Formation of district—By resolution of intention—Procedure.

In case the board of county commissioners shall desire to initiate the formation of a county road improvement district by resolution, it shall first pass a resolution declaring its intention to order such improvement, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of such proposed improvement, designating the number of the proposed road improvement district and describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will be borne by the property within the proposed district, notifying the owners of property therein to appear at a meeting of the board at the time specified in such resolution, and directing the county road engineer to submit to the board at or prior to the date fixed for such hearing a diagram or print showing thereon the lots, tracts and parcels of land and other property which will be specially benefited thereby and the estimated amount of the cost and expense of such improvement to be borne by each lot, tract or parcel of land or other property, and also designating thereon all property which is being purchased under contract from the county. The resolution of intention shall be published in at least two consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in such county, the date of the first publication to be at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed by such resolution for hearing before the board of county commissioners.

Notice of the adoption of the resolution of intention shall be given each owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract or parcel of land or other property within the proposed improvement district by mailing said notice to the owner or reputed owner of the property as shown on the tax rolls of the county treasurer at the address shown thereon at least fifteen days before the date fixed for the public hearing. The notice shall refer to the resolution of intention and designate the proposed improvement district by number. Said notice shall also set forth the nature of the proposed improvement, the total estimated cost, the proportion of total cost to be borne by assessments, the estimated amount of the cost and expense of such improvement to be borne by the particular lot, tract or parcel, the date and place of the hearing before the board of county commissioners, and shall contain the directions hereinafter provided for voting upon the formation of the proposed improvement district.

The clerk of the board shall prepare and mail, together with the notice above referred to, a ballot for each owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract or parcel of land within the proposed improvement district. This ballot shall contain the following proposition:

"Shall . . . . . . county road improvement district No. . . . . be formed?

Yes. . . .

□

No. . . .

□"

and, in addition, shall contain appropriate spaces for the signatures of the property owners, and a description of their property, and shall have printed thereon the direction that all ballots must be signed to be valid and must be returned to the clerk of the board of county commissioners not later than five o'clock p.m. of a day which shall be one week after the date of the public hearing.

The notice of adoption of the resolution of intention shall also contain the above directions, and, in addition thereto, shall state the rules by which the election shall be governed.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 66 s 2; 1963 c 84 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.030. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 3.]